California statutes. Education Code
(h) The dramatic increases in participation rates at both the high school and college levels since Title IX was passed show that when doors are opened to women and girls, they will rush through. Courts have repeatedly recognized that it is unfounded and unlawful to claim that women and girls are less interested in sports than men and boys. As one court stated, “interest and ability rarely develop in a vacuum; they evolve as a function of opportunity and experience...” (Cohen v. Brown University (1st Cir. 1996) 101 F.3d 155, 179). Accordingly, courts have repeatedly rejected arguments that the assessed interest level of girls in athletics should determine Title IX compliance (Neal v. California State University (9th Cir. 1999) 198 F.3d. 763, 767). Thus, interest surveys cannot accurately determine whether an educational institution has effectively accommodated the interests and abilities of female students.

(i) The United States Department of Education uses a three-part test adopted in 1979 to determine whether an educational institution has met the key Title IX requirement that a school “effectively accommodate the interests and abilities of members of both sexes” when it comes to athletic participation. All three prongs of the test have been used successfully by schools to comply with Title IX, and have given schools flexibility in structuring their athletic programs. The three-part test neither imposes quotas or requires preferential treatment, nor requires mirror-image men’s and women’s sports programs. The lawfulness of the three-part test has been affirmed by every federal appellate court to consider the issue.

(j) Despite major advances in athletic opportunities for females since 1972, discrimination still limits athletic opportunities for girls and women at all educational levels today. For example, although women in Division I colleges are 53 percent of the student body, they receive only 41 percent of the opportunities to play sports, 36 percent of the overall athletic operating budgets, and 32 percent of the dollars spent to recruit new athletes.

(k) In California, the percentage of female athletes at California State University (CSU) campuses actually declined from 36 percent in 1977 to 30 percent in 1990. In 1993, California National Organization for Women (Cal NOW) filed suit against the CSU system alleging violations of California’s gender equity in athletics law. Ultimately, CSU and Cal NOW entered into a consent decree focusing on participation, expenditures, and grants-in-aid for women athletes. As a result of the consent decree, women now comprise over 52 percent of CSU athletes, expenditures on women’s sports have increased 315 percent in the last 10 years and grants-in-aid for female athletes have increased 232 percent during the same time period.

(l) Despite major gains for women under California and federal law, inequities in the treatment of men’s and women’s and boys’ and girls’ athletic teams at some educational institutions remain. These inequities include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Participation rates for women and girls.

(2) Number of sports offered.

(3) Number of levels of teams.

(4) Encouragement by spirit and band groups.

(5) Facilities.

(6) Locker rooms.

(7) Scheduling of games and practice times.

(8) Level of financial support by the district, school, booster club or clubs, and outside sponsors.

(9) Treatment of coaches.

(10) Opportunities to receive coaching and academic tutors.

(11) Travel and per diem allowance.

(12) Medical and training facilities and services.

(13) Housing and dining facilities and services.

(14) Scholarship money.

(15) Publicity.

(m) Educational institutions at all levels are strongly encouraged to take immediate active steps toward full compliance with Title IX and California’s gender equity in athletics laws by reviewing all aspects of their athletic program, including those factors listed in subdivision (l) where appropriate, to ensure that they are offering male and female student athletes equivalent opportunities to play sports and that they are treating male and female athletes fairly. The need to encourage and increase athletic participation by girls and women is especially strong at educational institutions serving inner-city and urban communities. Full compliance with Title IX is nondiscretionary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 660, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

66271.7.

(a) It is the policy of the state that community college classes and courses, including nonacademic and elective classes and courses, shall be conducted without regard to the sex of the student enrolled in these classes and courses.

(b) No community college district shall prohibit any student from enrolling in any class or course on the basis of the sex of the student.

(c) No community college district shall require students of one sex to enroll in a particular class or course, unless the same class or course is also required of students of the opposite sex.

(d) No school counselor, teacher, instructor, administrator, or aide shall, on the basis of the sex of a student, offer vocational or school program guidance to students of one sex which is different from that offered to students of the opposite sex or, in counseling students, differentiate career, vocational or higher education opportunities on the basis of the sex of the student counseled. Any school personnel acting in a career counseling or course selection capacity to any pupil shall affirmatively explore with the pupil the possibility of careers, or courses leading to careers, that are nontraditional for that pupil’s sex.

(e) Participation in a particular physical education activity or sport, if required of students of one sex, shall be available to students of each sex.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 660, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

66271.8.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that female students should be accorded opportunities for participation in public postsecondary educational institution athletic programs equivalent to those accorded male students.

(b) In apportioning public funds, public postsecondary educational institutions shall apportion amounts available for athletics to ensure that equitable amounts will be allocated for all students, except that allowances may be made for differences in the costs of various athletic programs. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no public funds shall be used in connection with any athletic program conducted under the auspices of a public postsecondary educational institution, or any student organization within the postsecondary educational institution, that does not provide equivalent opportunity to both sexes for participation and use of facilities. The factors considered when determining whether an educational institution has provided equivalent opportunity include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Whether the selection of sports and levels of competition offered effectively accommodate the athletic interests and abilities of members of both sexes.

(2) The provision of equipment and supplies.

(3) Scheduling of games and practice times.

(4) Selection of the season for a sport.

(5) Location of the games and practices.

(6) Compensation for coaches.

(7) Travel arrangements.

(8) Per diem.

(9) Locker rooms.

(10) Practice and competitive facilities.

(11) Medical services.

(12) Housing facilities.

(13) Dining facilities.

(14) Scholarships.

(15) Publicity.

(c) Whether a postsecondary educational institution has effectively accommodated the athletic interests and abilities of members of both sexes shall be assessed in any one of the following ways:

(1) Whether intercollegiate level participation opportunities for male and female students are provided in numbers substantially proportionate to their respective enrollments.

(2) Where the members of one sex have been and are underrepresented among intercollegiate athletes, whether the institution can show a history and continuing practice of program expansion that is demonstrably responsive to the developing interest and abilities of the members of that sex.

(3) Where the members of one sex are underrepresented among intercollegiate athletes, and the institution cannot show a history and continuing practice of program expansion as required in paragraph (2), whether the institution can demonstrate that the interests and abilities of the members of that sex have been fully and effectively accommodated by the present program.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate any existing consent decree or any other settlement agreement entered into by an educational institution to address gender equity in athletic programs.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a public postsecondary educational institution to require competition between male and female students in school-sponsored athletic programs.

(f) If an educational institution must cut its athletic budget, the educational institution shall do so consistently with its legal obligation to comply with both state and federal gender equity laws.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the three-part test articulated in subdivision (c) be interpreted as it has been in the policies and regulations of the Office of Civil Rights in effect on January 1, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 81.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

66271.9.

(a) The California Community Colleges and the California State University shall, and a satellite campus of these systems and the University of California are encouraged to, provide reasonable accommodations on their respective campuses for a lactating student to express breast milk, breast-feed an infant child, or address other needs related to breast-feeding. Reasonable accommodations under this section include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Access to a private and secure room, other than a restroom, to express breast milk or breast-feed an infant child. The room shall have a comfortable place to sit and have a table or shelf to place
 equipment described in paragraph (3).

(2) Permission to bring onto a college or university campus a breast pump and any other equipment used to express breast milk.

(3) Access to a power source for a breast pump or any other equipment used to express breast milk.

(b) Lactating students on a college or university campus shall be provided a reasonable amount of time to accommodate their need to express breast milk or breast-feed an infant child.

(c) A campus of the California Community Colleges or the California State University may use an existing facility to meet the requirements specified in subdivision (a).

(d) Students shall not incur an academic penalty as a result of their use of the reasonable accommodations specified in this section, and shall be provided the opportunity to make up any work missed due to such use.

(e) Upon the construction of a new campus of the California Community Colleges or the California State University, the replacement, expansion, or renovation costing five million dollars ($5,000,000) or more involving plumbing of an existing building regularly used by students, including a student center, or the construction of a new building
 costing five million dollars ($5,000,000) or more designed for use by students, the respective educational institution shall provide a sink in addition to the accommodations described in subdivision (a) in a room in the newly constructed campus or building, or in a room in the replaced, expanded, or renovated building. This subdivision only applies to an educational institution if the campus room currently designated for a lactating student to express breast milk or breast-feed an infant child does not have a sink.

(f) This section does not require an existing room designated for a lactating student to express breast milk or breast-feed an infant child to have a sink.

(g) The lactation accommodation shall be available to a student whenever a student is required to
 be present on campus.

(h) (1) A complaint of noncompliance with the requirements of this section may be filed consistent with Subchapter 5 (commencing with Section 59300) of Chapter 10 of Division 6 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations. If the complaint is found to have merit, the campus or appropriate appellate body shall provide a remedy to the affected student. 

(2) A complaint of noncompliance with the requirements of this section may be filed consistent with the procedures established by the California State University for complaints by students of discrimination based on disability, gender, or other applicable characteristics, and a student shall be afforded any remedies the student is entitled to pursuant to those procedures.

(i) This section does not infringe on any right to breast-feed in public pursuant to Section 43.3 of the Civil Code or any other law.

(j) The requirements in this section shall be implemented by the California Community Colleges and the California State University, and the University of California is urged to implement the requirements in this section, no later than January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.   (AB 2785)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

66272.

This article shall not apply to an educational institution whose primary purpose is the training of individuals for the military services of the United States, or the merchant marine.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 222 by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66273.

This article shall not apply to the membership practices of a social fraternity or social sorority, exempt from taxation under subdivision (a) of Section 501 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1954, whose active membership consists primarily of students in attendance at a postsecondary educational institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66276.

This article shall not apply to any scholarship or other financial assistance awarded by a postsecondary educational institution to any individual upon the basis of a combination of factors related to the individual’s personal appearance, poise, and talent as an award in any pageant in which participation is limited exclusively to individuals of one sex, provided that the pageant complies with other nondiscrimination provisions of state and federal law.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 226 by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66277.

In regard to admissions to educational institutions, this article shall apply only to institutions of vocational, professional, or postgraduate education, and to public postsecondary education institutions.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 227 by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66278.

In regard to admissions to educational institutions, this article shall not apply to any public institution of undergraduate higher education which traditionally and continually from its establishment has had a policy of admitting only students of one sex.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 228 by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66279.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, and in furtherance of complying with Section 66270, each campus of the California State University shall establish, on or before July 1, 2026, a Title IX office in a private space for students and employees to disclose reports and complaints of sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment. The established Title IX office space may be located within an existing office on campus, including, but not limited to, a civil rights office or antidiscrimination office. The Title IX office shall be under the administration of a Title IX coordinator who shall be responsible for coordinating the campus’ implementation of and compliance with the systemwide nondiscrimination policy established pursuant to Section 66280.

(2) The Title IX office shall do all of the following:

(A) Ensure timely and effective responses to reports and complaints of sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment.

(B) Provide supportive measures to complainants, and, as applicable, respondents.

(C) Provide a process of adjudicating and resolving complaints of sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment, pursuant to the systemwide nondiscrimination policy established pursuant to Section 66280.

(D) Maintain a case management system that includes all of the following information for each complaint of sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment:

(i) The date of the complaint and the date, nature, and location of the alleged incident or incidents.

(ii) The name of the person who reported the complaint and the person’s affiliation with the campus, or whether the complaint was reported anonymously.

(iii) The name and title of the person who received the complaint.

(iv) The name of the person alleged to have experienced sex discrimination and their affiliation with the campus.

(v) The name of the respondent and the respondent’s affiliation with the campus.

(vi) Any campus community context, including, but not limited to, the athletic team, student organization, or campus
 department or office where the alleged incident or incidents occurred.

(vii) Whether the complaint was received by the campus, along with a copy of the notice of allegations provided to the parties. If the campus dismissed the complaint, a copy of the written notice of dismissal provided to the parties with the reason for the dismissal.

(viii) Whether the campus opened an investigation of the complaint and, if applicable, its reason for declining to investigate the complaint.

(ix) The name of the person assigned to investigate the complaint, and the name of the person assigned to implement any supportive measures pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(x) All supportive measures offered and implemented in response to the complaint pursuant to subparagraph
 (B).

(xi) The names of all witnesses identified by either party, interview notes or summaries, if available, and, for any witnesses who were not interviewed, an explanation of why they were not interviewed.

(xii) Once completed, the final investigative report for the complaint and any response made to the final investigative report by the complainant or respondent.

(xiii) The outcome of the complaint, including, if applicable, the rulings from a hearing on the complaint and any disciplinary measures.

(xiv) The remedies implemented by the Title IX coordinator and the campus, if applicable, to deter and prevent the recurrence of sex discrimination incidents.

(E) Develop and implement a
 prevention and outreach program on sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment. This program shall be reviewed and, if necessary, updated annually to address sex discrimination incidents and prevent the recurrence of sex discrimination incidents. The program shall do all of the following:

(i) Address a range of strategies to prevent sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, a survivor empowerment program, a public awareness campaign, primary prevention, bystander intervention, and risk reduction.

(ii) Provide to students, faculty, and staff information regarding the protocols for reporting complaints of sex discrimination, including the name, office location, and contact information of the Title IX coordinator, by both of the following means:

(I) Emailing the information to each
 student, faculty member, and staff member at the beginning of each academic semester or other academic term.

(II) Including the information as part of an on-campus orientation program pursuant to Section 67385.7.

(F) Develop and implement a campus prevention training program for students, faculty, and staff. The campus prevention training shall do, or include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(i) Incorporate required bystander intervention training, policy awareness training, and primary prevention training.

(ii) Adopt an approach of intersectionality that calls for a pursuit of culturally relevant programs and practices that name and meaningfully consider how students, faculty, and staff of various identities, including, but not limited to,
 race, national origin, gender identity, class, sexual orientation, and ability, interact with each other.

(iii) Training that contains feedback loops to determine if the training is having the intended effect.

(iv) Training that complies with Section 67385.7.

(v) In response to patterns of occurrences of sex discrimination incidents, provide additional prevention training to student organizations on campus, including, but not limited to, college-affiliated fraternities and sororities, athletic teams, and students who reside on campus.

(b) (1) The Title IX coordinator shall have the authority and responsibility to implement a consistent campuswide response to complaints of sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual
 harassment. The Title IX coordinator shall have the experience, training, and expertise necessary to coordinate and carry out the systemwide nondiscrimination policy established pursuant to Section 66280. The Title IX coordinator shall operate with the authority, independence, and resources necessary to fulfill the duties required by this section. The Title IX coordinator shall be a full-time position, and shall be responsible for preventing and addressing sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment, on campus.

(2) The Title IX coordinator shall meet, on or before September 1, 2026, and at least once every three months thereafter, with the campus president to provide an update on the Title IX office’s compliance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The update shall include how the campus is fulfilling the obligation to provide educational programs free from sex discrimination. Beginning on September 1, 2027, and each
 year thereafter, an annual summary of the updates shall be posted on the campus internet website.

(c) Beginning with the 2026–27 academic year, the Title IX coordinator and the president of the campus shall assess whether additional staffing or resources are needed by the Title IX office to fulfill the duties of the Title IX office established pursuant to this section. If additional staff or resources are needed, the Title IX coordinator and the president of the campus shall make a request for the additional staffing or resources to be included in the annual systemwide budget request made by the system to the Governor, in compliance with the policies established by the system for making budgetary requests.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 693, Sec. 1.   (AB 2047)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66279.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, and in furtherance of complying with Section 66270, each campus of the University of California shall designate, on or before July 1, 2026, a private space, known as the Title IX office, for students and employees to disclose reports and complaints of sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment. The designated Title IX office space may be located within an existing office on campus, including, but not limited to, a civil rights office or antidiscrimination office. The Title IX office shall be under the administration of a Title IX coordinator who shall be responsible for coordinating the campus’ implementation of and compliance with the systemwide nondiscrimination policy identified and maintained pursuant to Section
 66280.5.

(2) The Title IX coordinator and designated staff shall do all of the following:

(A) Oversee and ensure timely and effective responses to reports and complaints of sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment.

(B) Oversee the provision of supportive measures to complainants, and, as applicable, respondents.

(C) Oversee the process of adjudicating and resolving complaints of sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment, pursuant to the systemwide nondiscrimination policy identified and maintained pursuant to Section 66280.5.

(D) Maintain a case management system that includes all of the following information for each complaint of sex
 discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment:

(i) The date of the complaint and the date, nature, and location of the alleged incident or incidents.

(ii) The name of the person who reported the complaint and the person’s affiliation with the campus, or whether the complaint was reported anonymously.

(iii) The name and title of the person who received the complaint.

(iv) The name of the person alleged to have experienced sex discrimination and their affiliation with the campus.

(v) The name of the respondent and the respondent’s affiliation with the campus.

(vi) Any campus community context, including, but
 not limited to, the athletic team, student organization, or campus department or office where the alleged incident or incidents occurred.

(vii) A copy of the notice of allegations provided to the parties. If the campus dismissed the complaint, a copy of the written notice of dismissal provided to the parties with the reason for the dismissal.

(viii) Whether the campus opened an investigation of the complaint and, if applicable, its reason for declining to investigate the complaint.

(ix) The name of the person assigned to investigate the complaint, and the name of the person assigned to implement any supportive measures pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(x) All supportive measures offered and implemented in response to the complaint pursuant to subparagraph
 (B).

(xi) The names of all witnesses identified by either party, interview notes or summaries, if available, and, for any witnesses who were not interviewed, an explanation of why they were not interviewed.

(xii) Once completed, the final investigative report for the complaint and any response made to the final investigative report by the complainant or respondent.

(xiii) The outcome of the complaint, including, if applicable, the rulings from a hearing on the complaint and any disciplinary measures.

(xiv) The remedies implemented by the Title IX coordinator and the campus, if applicable, to deter and prevent the recurrence of sex discrimination incidents.

(E) Oversee the development and
 implementation of a prevention and outreach program on sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment. This program shall be reviewed and, if necessary, updated annually to address sex discrimination incidents and prevent the recurrence of sex discrimination incidents. The program shall do all of the following:

(i) Address a range of strategies to prevent sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, a survivor empowerment program, a public awareness campaign, primary prevention, bystander intervention, and risk reduction.

(ii) Provide to students, faculty, and staff information regarding the protocols for reporting complaints of sex discrimination, including the name, office location, and contact information of the Title IX coordinator, by both of the following means:

(I) Emailing the
 information to each student, faculty member, and staff member at the beginning of each academic semester or other academic term.

(II) Including the information as part of an on-campus orientation program pursuant to Section 67385.7.

(F) Oversee the development and implementation of a campus prevention training program for students, faculty, and staff. The campus prevention training shall do, or include, all of the following:

(i) Incorporate required bystander intervention training, policy awareness training, and primary prevention training.

(ii) Adopt an approach of intersectionality that calls for a pursuit of culturally relevant programs and practices that name and meaningfully consider how students, faculty, and staff of various identities,
 including, but not limited to, race, national origin, gender identity, class, sexual orientation, and ability, interact with each other.

(iii) Training that contains feedback loops to determine if the training is having the intended effect.

(iv) Training that complies with Section 67385.7.

(v) In response to patterns of occurrences of sex discrimination incidents, provide additional prevention training to student organizations on campus, including, but not limited to, college-affiliated fraternities and sororities, athletic teams, and students who reside on campus.

(b) (1) The Title IX coordinator shall have the authority and responsibility to implement a consistent campuswide response to complaints of sex discrimination,
 including, but not limited to, sexual harassment. The Title IX coordinator shall have the experience, training, and expertise necessary to coordinate and carry out the systemwide nondiscrimination policy identified and maintained pursuant to Section 66280.5. The Title IX coordinator shall operate with the authority, independence, and resources necessary to fulfill the duties required by this section. The Title IX coordinator shall be a full-time position, and shall be responsible for overseeing campuswide efforts to prevent and address sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment, on campus.

(2) The Title IX coordinator shall meet, on or before September 1, 2026, and at least once every three months thereafter, with the campus chancellor to provide updates on the Title IX office’s compliance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The updates shall include an update on how the campus is fulfilling the obligation to
 provide educational programs free from sex discrimination. Beginning on September 1, 2027, and each year thereafter, an annual summary of the updates shall be posted on the campus internet website.

(c) Beginning with the 2026–27 academic year, the Title IX coordinator shall recommend to the chancellor of the campus whether additional staffing or resources are needed to fulfill the duties required by this section. If additional staff or resources are needed, the chancellor of the campus shall make a request for the additional staffing or resources, in compliance with the policies established by the system for making budgetary requests.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 67400, this section shall apply to the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 693, Sec. 2.   (AB 2047)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66280.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, in order to be in compliance with Section 66270, the California State University shall do both of the following on or before July 1, 2026:

(1) Establish a systemwide Office of Civil Rights for the purpose of ensuring campus programs and activities are free from sex discrimination. The office shall be led by the systemwide civil rights officer designated pursuant to paragraph (2), who shall report on a periodic and regular basis to the Chancellor of the California State University and the Trustees of the California State University about the status of the implementation of the systemwide nondiscrimination policies pursuant to this section. The systemwide civil rights officer shall be responsible for coordinating
 the system’s implementation of and compliance with the systemwide nondiscrimination policies established pursuant to this section.

(2) Establish the position of, and designate a staff person as, the systemwide civil rights officer to monitor the system’s compliance with Section 66292.1. The systemwide civil rights officer shall have the experience, training, and expertise necessary to coordinate and carry out the requirements of the systemwide Office of Civil Rights pursuant to this section, and to, if necessary, recruit, hire, and train personnel to carry out the requirements of this section.

(b) The systemwide Office of Civil Rights established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall do all of the following:

(1) In consultation with confidential advocates, sexual assault and domestic violence counselors,
 students, faculty, and staff, establish and adopt a single, systemwide nondiscrimination policy for the entire system. The policy shall incorporate state and federal law pertaining to the prevention of sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681, et seq.) and Sections 66281.4, 66281.5, 66281.8, 67385, 67385.7, and 67386.

(2) In accordance with the policy adopted pursuant to paragraph (1), develop and implement a grievance procedure for prompt and equitable processing, adjudication, and resolution of all complaints of sex discrimination filed by students, faculty, or staff in which the respondent is any of the following:

(A) A campus president.

(B) A campus Title IX coordinator.

(C) An employee of the office of the Chancellor of the California State University.

(D) A member of the Trustees of the California State University.

(E) The Chancellor of the California State University.

(3) Adjudicate any complaints described in paragraph (2) in accordance with the systemwide nondiscrimination policy adopted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) Provide annual training for personnel in Title IX offices on a campus of the California State University.

(5) Establish and serve as a resource for the implementation of the best practices guidance for the prevention of sex discrimination and the adjudication of complaints of sex discrimination as required by the systemwide
 nondiscrimination policy adopted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(6) Process appeals for sex discrimination complaints pursuant to Section 66292.3.

(7) (A) Conduct a compliance review, at least once every three years, of each campus of the California State University to determine whether they are complying with the systemwide nondiscrimination policy pursuant to paragraph (1) and the best practices established pursuant to paragraph (5).

(B) The compliance reviews conducted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be presented during a public session of the Trustees of the California State University in the year the review is completed and shall be made public on the internet website of the trustees and on the campus internet website.

(8) Establish a range of disciplinary sanctions for respondents who are students, faculty, or staff of the system and who are found to have violated the system’s nondiscrimination policy.

(9) Annually assess whether the systemwide Office of Civil Rights requires additional staffing or resources to comply with this section, and, if required, make a request for the additional staffing or resources to be included in the annual systemwide budget request made by the system to the Governor, in compliance with the policies established by the system for making budgetary requests.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 693, Sec. 3.   (AB 2047)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66280.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, in order to be in compliance with Section 66270, the University of California shall do both of the following on or before July 1, 2026:

(1) Designate a systemwide Office of Civil Rights for the purpose of ensuring campus programs and activities are free from sex discrimination. The office shall be led by the systemwide civil rights officer designated pursuant to paragraph (2), who shall report on a periodic basis to the President of the University of California and the Regents of the University of California about the status of the implementation of the systemwide nondiscrimination policies pursuant to this section. The systemwide civil rights officer shall be responsible for coordinating the system’s implementation of and
 compliance with the systemwide nondiscrimination policies established pursuant to this section.

(2) Establish the position of, and designate a staff person as, the systemwide civil rights officer to monitor the system’s compliance with Section 66292.2. The systemwide civil rights officer shall have the experience, training, and expertise necessary to coordinate and carry out the requirements of the systemwide Office of Civil Rights pursuant to this section, and to, if necessary, recruit, hire, and train personnel to carry out the requirements of this section.

(b) The systemwide Office of Civil Rights established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall do all of the following:

(1) Identify and maintain a single, systemwide nondiscrimination policy for the entire system. The policy shall incorporate state
 and federal law pertaining to the prevention of sex discrimination, including, but not limited to, Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681, et seq.) and Sections 66281.4, 66281.5, 66281.8, 67385, 67385.7, and 67386.

(2) In accordance with the policy identified and maintained pursuant to paragraph (1), develop and implement a grievance procedure for prompt and equitable processing, adjudication, and resolution of all complaints of sex discrimination filed by students, faculty, or staff in which the respondent is any of the following:

(A) A campus chancellor.

(B) A campus Title IX coordinator.

(C) An employee of the office of the President of the University of California.

(D) A member of the Regents of the University of California.

(E) The President of the University of California.

(3) Oversee the adjudication of any complaints described in paragraph (2) in accordance with the systemwide nondiscrimination policy identified and maintained pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) Oversee the annual training for personnel in Title IX offices on a campus of the University of California.

(5) Establish and serve as a resource for the implementation of best practices guidance for the prevention of sex discrimination and the adjudication of complaints of sex discrimination as required by the systemwide nondiscrimination policy identified and maintained pursuant to paragraph (1).

(6) (A) Conduct a compliance review, at least once every five years, of each campus of the University of California to determine whether they are complying with the systemwide nondiscrimination policy identified and maintained pursuant to paragraph (1) and the best practices established pursuant to paragraph (5).

(B) The compliance reviews conducted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be presented during a public session of the Regents of the University of California in the year the review is completed and shall be made public on the internet website of the regents and on the campus internet website.

(7) Establish a range of disciplinary sanctions for respondents who are students, faculty, or staff of the system and who are found to have violated the system’s nondiscrimination policy.

(8) Annually assess whether the systemwide Office of Civil Rights requires additional staffing or resources to comply with this section, and, if required, make a request for the additional staffing or resources in compliance with the policies established by the system for making budgetary requests.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 67400, this section shall apply to the University of California.
